Montana, session 2025, HB127.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Section 76-13-150, MCA, is amended to read:
"76-13-150. Fire suppression account -- fund transfer. (1) There is a fire suppression account in
the state special revenue fund to the credit of the department.
(2) The legislature may transfer money from other funds to the account, and the money in the
account is subject to legislative fund transfers.
(3) Funds received for restitution by private parties must be deposited in the account.
(4) Money in the account may be used only for:
(a) fire suppression costs;
(b) fuel reduction and mitigation;
(c) forest restoration;
(d) grants for the purchase of fire suppression equipment for county cooperatives;
(e) forest management projects on federal land;
(f) support for collaborative groups that include at least one representative of an affected county
commission that is engaged with a federal forest project and for local governments engaged in litigation related
to federal forest projects;
(g) road maintenance on federal lands; and
(h) fire preparedness.
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 127
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 127
(5) In an even-numbered calendar year, after the transfers made pursuant to 17-7-130, if the
preliminary general fund ending balance at fiscal yearend was greater than 8.3% of all general revenue
appropriations in the second year of the biennium, then the state treasurer shall transfer from the general fund
to the fire suppression account funds sufficient to bring the fire suppression account fund balance to 6% of the
general revenue appropriations in the second year of the biennium. The transfer may not cause the general
fund ending fund balance to have a balance of less than 8.3% of all general revenue appropriations in the
second year of the biennium.
(6) The provisions of subsection (5) do not apply in a fiscal year in which reductions required by
17-7-140 occur or if a transfer pursuant to subsection (5) would require reductions pursuant to 17-7-140.
(7) If the balance in the account at the end of the most recently completed odd-numbered fiscal
year exceeds 3% of all general revenue appropriations in the second year of the biennium, then up to 1% of all
general revenue appropriations in the second year of the biennium may be used and is statutorily appropriated
from the fire suppression account for the purposes in subsections (4)(b) through (4)(g). Of that amount, no
more than 5% may be used for the purposes of subsection (4)(f).
(8) For the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, up Up to 0.5% of all general revenue appropriations
in the second year of the biennium is statutorily appropriated from the fire suppression account each year and
may be used each year to the department for the item in subsection (4)(h).
(9) Money in the account is statutorily appropriated, as provided in 17-7-502, to the department for
the purposes described in subsection (4)."
Section 2. Report by department of natural resources and conservation. By November 1 of each
fiscal year, the department of natural resources and conservation shall report in accordance with 5-11-210 to
the natural resources and transportation budget committee provided for in 5-12-501 on the expenditures made
pursuant to each subsection of 76-13-150(4) for that fiscal year.
Section 3. Codification instruction. [Section 2] is intended to be codified as an integral part of Title
76, chapter 13, part 1, and the provisions of Title 76, chapter 13, part 1, apply to [section 2].
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 127
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 127
Section 4. Effective date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.
- END -
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – HB 127
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 127, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 127
INTRODUCED BY L. JONES, W. GALT, L. MUSZKIEWICZ, J. ISALY, J. SECKINGER, S. ROSENZWEIG, E.
TILLEMAN, D. BEDEY, E. BUTTREY, M. CUFFE, W. CURDY, B. GILLESPIE, S. GIST, C. SPRUNGER, G.
LAMMERS, D. LOGE, S. FITZPATRICK, B. LER, K. WALSH, G. OBLANDER, J. FITZPATRICK, S.
MORIGEAU, M. THANE, P. TUSS, Z. WIRTH
AN ACT AMENDING THE FIRE SUPPRESSION ACCOUNT TO REMOVE DATE REFERENCES FOR
STATUTORY APPROPRIATIONS; ESTABLISHING REPORTING REQUIREMENTS FOR THE DEPARTMENT
OF NATURAL RESOURCES AND CONSERVATION; AMENDING SECTION 76-13-150, MCA; AND
PROVIDING AN IMMEDIATE EFFECTIVE DATE.